Tennessee, session 114, SB0222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351(g)(2), is amended by
deleting "thirty (30) days" and substituting instead "forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0222
001370
- 1 -